Washington statutes.
RCW 19.142.050

Notice of cancellation—Refund.

After receipt of a written notice of cancellation, the health studio shall provide a refund to the buyer within thirty days. The health studio may require the buyer to return any membership card or other materials which evidence membership in the health studio. The buyer is entitled to a refund and relief from future obligations for payments of initiation or membership fees and use fees or dues as follows:

(1) The buyer is entitled to a refund of the unused portion of any prepaid use fees or dues and relief from future obligations to pay use fees or dues concerning use after the date of cancellation.

(2)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, if a contract includes a one-time only initiation or membership fee and the buyer cancels pursuant to RCW 19.142.040(7)(a), the buyer is entitled to a pro rata refund of the fee less a predetermined amount not to exceed one-half of the initial initiation or membership fee if the contract clearly states what percentage of the fee is nonrefundable or refundable.

(b) If a contract includes a one-time only initiation or membership fee and the buyer cancels pursuant to RCW 19.142.040(7)(a) three years or more after the signing of the contract requiring payment of such fee, such fee is nonrefundable.

(3) If a contract includes an initiation or membership fee and the buyer cancels pursuant to RCW 19.142.040(7) (b) or (c), the buyer is entitled to a pro rata refund of the fee less a predetermined amount not to exceed one-half of the initial initiation or membership fee unless the following clause is contained in the contract and signed separately by the buyer. The clause shall be placed under a conspicuous caption in capital letters and boldface type stating the following:

NONREFUNDABLE AMOUNT

I UNDERSTAND THAT I HAVE PAID OR AM OBLIGATED TO PAY . . . . . . AS AN INITIATION OR MEMBERSHIP FEE, AND THAT UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES IS ANY PORTION OF THIS AMOUNT REFUNDABLE.

. . . .

(Buyer's Signature)

(4) If a contract includes a one-time only initiation or membership fee and the buyer cancels pursuant to RCW 19.142.040(7)(d), the buyer is entitled to a pro rata refund of the fee.

(5) If a contract includes a one-time only initiation or membership fee and the buyer cancels pursuant to RCW 19.142.040(7) (e) or (f), the buyer is entitled to a full refund of the fee.

If a buyer is entitled to a pro rata refund under this section, the amount shall be computed by dividing the contract price by the number of weeks in the contract term and multiplying the result by the number of weeks remaining in the contract term. If no term is stated in the contract, a term of thirty-six months shall be used.

[ 1990 c 55 s 3; 1987 c 317 s 6.]